Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 3. General Provisions.

Sec. 18.09.900.
Regulations.

The department may adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 96 SLA 2010)

Sec. 18.09.990.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“assessable entity” means

a health care insurer as defined in AS

21.54.500

;

an entity that provides the state health care plan described in AS

39.30.090

and

39.30.091

;

a public or private entity that offers a publicly funded plan in the state, to the extent participation in the program is authorized by law;

a third-party administrator as defined in AS

21.97.900

;

“commission” means the Alaska Health Care Commission established in AS

18.09.010

;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of health and social services;

“council” means the State Vaccine Assessment Council;

“covered individual” means an adult or child who resides in the state and who is provided insurance coverage for an included vaccine by an assessable entity or who is a patient of another program participant;

“department” means the Department of Health and Social Services.

“included vaccine” means a vaccine recommended by the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, United States Department of Health and Human Services, and included on a list maintained by the commissioner for inclusion in the program;

“other program participant” and “another program participant” mean a health care provider or group of providers who have opted into the program under AS

18.09.225

to both purchase vaccines for and administer vaccinations to residents of the state;

“program” means the statewide immunization program;

“provider” means a person licensed or certified by the state to administer vaccines or provide health care services or a partnership, corporation, or other entity made up of persons licensed or certified to administer vaccines or provide health care services;

“vaccine” means a preparation of killed microorganisms, living attenuated organisms, living fully virulent organisms, or other substances that are administered to humans for the purpose of producing or artificially increasing specific immunity to life-threatening and disabling diseases.

History.

(§ 2 ch 96 SLA 2010; am § 2 ch 30 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraphs (1) and (3) — (5) were enacted as paragraphs (3) — (6) and renumbered in 2014.

This section was reorganized in 2014 to maintain the terms in alphabetical order.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective January 1, 2015, added (3) [now (1)], (4) — (6) [now (3) — (5)], (6) [now (2)], and (7) — (11).